Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.130

Criteria.

(1) In granting an allocation, reallocation, or carryforward of the state ceiling as provided in this chapter, the agency shall consider existing state priorities and other such criteria, including but not limited to, the following criteria:

(a) Need of issuers to issue bonds within a bond use category subject to a state ceiling;

(b) Amount of the state ceiling available;

(c) Public benefit and purpose to be satisfied, including economic development, educational opportunity, and public health, safety, or welfare;

(d) Cost or availability of alternative methods of financing for the project or program; and

(e) Certainty of using the allocation which is being requested.

(2) In determining whether to allocate an amount of the state ceiling to an issuer within any bond use category, the agency shall consider, but is not limited to, the following criteria for each of the bond use categories:

(a) Housing: Criteria which comply with RCW 43.180.200.

(b) Student loans: Criteria which comply with the applicable provisions of Title 28B RCW and rules adopted by the office of student financial assistance or applicable state agency dealing with student financial aid.

(c) Small issue: Factors which may include:

(i) The number of employment opportunities the project is likely to create or retain in relation to the amount of the bond issuance;

(ii) The level of unemployment existing in the geographic area likely to be affected by the project;

(iii) A commitment to providing employment opportunities to low-income persons in cooperation with the employment security department;

(iv) Geographic distribution of projects;

(v) The number of persons who will benefit from the project;

(vi) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section; and

(vii) Order in which requests were received.

(d) Exempt facility or redevelopment: Factors which may include:

(i) State issuance needs;

(ii) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section;

(iii) Order in which requests were received;

(iv) The proportionate number of persons in relationship to the size of the community who will benefit from the project; and

(v) The unique timing and issuance needs of large scale projects that may require allocations in more than one year.

(e) Public utility: Factors which may include:

(i) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii) Timing needs for issuance of bonds over a multi-year period.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 243; 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 7; 1987 c 297 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Short title—2010 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 43.180.160.